Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1602
Property used in commission of covered offenses; forfeiture; prosecuting authority; duties; pleading; contents.

(1) The prosecuting authority must specifically plead its intent to seek forfeiture of any property upon a conviction for a covered offense in the same criminal information charging the underlying covered offense.

(2) In pleading its intent to seek forfeiture, the information shall specifically (a) state the date the property was seized, (b) state the place the property was seized from, (c) describe the property sought to be forfeited, and (d) if known, state the name of the owner of the property, the name of the person or persons in possession of the property or in physical proximity to the property when it was seized, and the name of any other person or entity that may have a claim or interest in the property.

Laws 2016, LB1106, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB559, § 11.